Nebraska, session 109, LB735.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
Section 1. RESPIRATORY CARE INTERSTATE COMPACT
SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE
A. The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate the interstate
Practice of Respiratory Therapy with the goal of improving public access
to Respiratory Therapy services by providing Respiratory Therapists
licensed in a Member State the ability to practice in other Member
States. The Compact preserves the regulatory authority of states to
protect public health and safety through the current system of State
licensure.
B. This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
1. Increase public access to Respiratory Therapy services by
creating a responsible, streamlined pathway for Licensees to practice in
Member States with the goal of improving outcomes for patients;
2. Enhance States' ability to protect the public's health and
safety;
3. Promote the cooperation of Member States in regulating the
Practice of Respiratory Therapy within those Member States;
4. Ease administrative burdens on States by encouraging the
cooperation of Member States in regulating multi-state Respiratory
Therapy practice;
5. Support relocating Active Military Members and their spouses; and
6. Promote mobility and address workforce shortages.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
A. Active Military Member means any person with a full-time duty
status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the
National Guard and Reserve.
B. Adverse Action means any administrative, civil, equitable, or
criminal action permitted by a State's laws which is imposed by any State
authority with regulatory authority over Respiratory Therapists, such as
-2-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
license denial, censure, revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of
the Licensee, or restriction on the Licensee's practice, not including
participation in an Alternative Program.
C. Alternative Program means a non-disciplinary monitoring or
practice remediation process applicable to a Respiratory Therapist
approved by any State authority with regulatory authority over
Respiratory Therapists. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to
which Licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues are referred in
lieu of Adverse Action.
D. Charter Member States means those Member States who were the
first seven states to enact the Compact into the laws of their State.
E. Commission or Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission
means the government instrumentality and body politic whose membership
consists of all Member States that have enacted the Compact.
F. Commissioner means the individual appointed by a Member State to
serve as the member of the Commission for that Member State.
G. Compact means the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact.
H. Compact Privilege means the authorization granted by a Remote
State to allow a Licensee from another Member State to practice as a
Respiratory Therapist in the Remote State under the Remote State's laws
and Rules. The Practice of Respiratory Therapy occurs in the Member State
where the patient is located at the time of the patient encounter.
I. Criminal Background Check means the submission by the Member
State of fingerprints or other biometric-based information on license
applicants at the time of initial licensing for the purpose of obtaining
that applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in 28
C.F.R. 20.3(d) or successor provision, from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the State's criminal history record repository, as
defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(f) or successor provision.
J. Data System means the Commission's repository of information
about Licensees as further set forth in Section 8.
-3-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
K. Domicile means the jurisdiction which is the Licensee's principal
home for legal purposes.
L. Encumbered License means a license that a State's Respiratory
Therapy Licensing Authority has limited in any way.
M. Executive Committee means a group of directors elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by
the Commission.
N. Home State except as set forth in Section 5, means the Member
State that is the Licensee's primary Domicile.
O. Home State License means an active license to practice
Respiratory Therapy in a Home State that is not an Encumbered License.
P. Jurisprudence Requirement means an assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the State laws and regulations governing the Practice of
Respiratory Therapy in such State.
Q. Licensee means an individual who currently holds an authorization
from the State to practice as a Respiratory Therapist.
R. Member State means a State that has enacted the Compact and been
admitted to the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein and
Commission Rules.
S. Model Compact means the model for the Respiratory Care Interstate
Compact on file with The Council of State Governments or other entity as
designated by the Commission.
T. Remote State means a Member State where a Licensee is exercising
or seeking to exercise the Compact Privilege.
U. Respiratory Therapist or Respiratory Care Practitioner means an
individual who holds a credential issued by the National Board for
Respiratory Care (or its successor) and holds a license in a State to
practice Respiratory Therapy. For purposes of this Compact, any other
title or status adopted by a State to replace the term Respiratory
Therapist or Respiratory Care Practitioner shall be deemed synonymous
with Respiratory Therapist and shall confer the same rights and
-4-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
responsibilities to the Licensee under the provisions of this Compact at
the time of its enactment.
V. Respiratory Therapy, Respiratory Therapy Practice, Respiratory
Care, the Practice of Respiratory Care, and the Practice of Respiratory
Therapy means the care and services provided by or under the direction
and supervision of a Respiratory Therapist or Respiratory Care
Practitioner.
W. Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority means the agency, board,
or other body of a State that is responsible for licensing and regulation
of Respiratory Therapists.
X. Rule means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the
force and effect of law.
Y. Scope of Practice means the procedures, actions, and processes a
Respiratory Therapist licensed in a State or practicing under a Compact
Privilege in a State is permitted to undertake in that State and the
circumstances under which the Respiratory Therapist is permitted to
undertake those procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures,
actions, and processes, and the circumstances under which they may be
undertaken may be established through means, including, but not limited
to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the
State Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority or other government agency.
Z. Significant Investigative Information means information, records,
and documents received or generated by a State Respiratory Therapy
Licensing Authority pursuant to an investigation for which a
determination has been made that there is probable cause to believe that
the Licensee has violated a statute or regulation that is considered more
than a minor infraction for which the State Respiratory Therapy Licensing
Authority could pursue Adverse Action against the Licensee.
AA. State means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THIS COMPACT
-5-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
A. In order to participate in this Compact and thereafter continue
as a Member State, a Member State shall:
1. Enact a Compact that is not materially different from the Model
Compact;
2. License Respiratory Therapists;
3. Participate in the Commission's Data System;
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints against Licensees and Compact Privilege holders;
5. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of this
Compact and Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action against a Licensee, a
Compact Privilege holder, or a license applicant;
6. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of this
Compact and Commission Rules, of the existence of Significant
Investigative Information;
7. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;
8. Grant the Compact Privilege to a holder of an active Home State
License who otherwise meets the applicable requirements of Section 4 in a
Member State; and
9. Complete a Criminal Background Check for each new Licensee at the
time of initial licensure.
a. Where expressly authorized or permitted by federal law, whether
such federal law is in effect prior to, at, or after the time of a Member
State's enactment of this Compact, a Member State's enactment of this
Compact shall hereby authorize the Member State's Respiratory Therapy
Licensing Authority to perform Criminal Background Checks as defined
herein. The absence of such a federal law as described in this subsection
shall not prevent or preclude such authorization where it may be derived
or granted through means other than the enactment of this Compact.
B. Nothing in this Compact prohibits a Member State from charging a
fee for granting and renewing the Compact Privilege.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
-6-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
A. To exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and provisions
of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
1. Hold and maintain an active Home State License as a Respiratory
Therapist;
2. Hold and maintain an active credential from the National Board
for Respiratory Care (or its successor) that would qualify them for
licensure in the Remote State in which they are seeking the privilege;
3. Have not had any Adverse Action against a license within the
previous two years;
4. Notify the Commission that the Licensee is seeking the Compact
Privilege within a Remote State;
5. Pay any applicable fees, including any State and Commission fees
and renewal fees, for the Compact Privilege;
6. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the Remote
State in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege;
7. Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by any non-Member
State within thirty days from the date the Adverse Action is taken;
8. Report to the Commission, when applying for a Compact Privilege,
the address of the Licensee's Domicile and thereafter promptly report to
the Commission any change in the address of the Licensee's Domicile
within thirty days of the effective date of the change in address; and
9. Consent to accept service of process by mail at the Licensee's
Domicile on record with the Commission with respect to any action brought
against the Licensee by the Commission or a Member State, and consent to
accept service of a subpoena by mail at the Licensee's Domicile on record
with the Commission with respect to any action brought or investigation
conducted by the Commission or a Member State.
B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date or
revocation of the Home State License unless terminated pursuant to
Adverse Action. The Licensee must comply with all of the requirements of
Subsection A, above, to maintain the Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
-7-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
If those requirements are met, no Adverse Actions are taken, and the
Licensee has paid any applicable Compact Privilege renewal fees, then the
Licensee will maintain the Licensee's Compact Privilege.
C. A Licensee providing Respiratory Therapy in a Remote State under
the Compact Privilege shall function within the Scope of Practice
authorized by the Remote State for the type of Respiratory Therapist
license the Licensee holds. Such procedures, actions, processes, and the
circumstances under which they may be undertaken may be established
through means, including, but not limited to, statute, regulations, case
law, and other processes available to the State Respiratory Therapy
Licensing Authority or other government agency.
D. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is removed by
the Remote State, the individual shall lose or be ineligible for the
Compact privilege in that Remote State until the Compact Privilege is no
longer limited or restricted by that State.
E. If a Home State License is encumbered, the Licensee shall lose
the Compact Privilege in all Remote States until the following occur:
1. The Home State License is no longer encumbered; and
2. Two years have elapsed from the date on which the license is no
longer encumbered due to the Adverse Action.
F. Once a Licensee with a restricted or limited license meets the
requirements of Subsection E.1 and 2, the Licensee must also meet the
requirements of Subsection A to obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote
State.
SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSE
A. An Active Military Member, or their spouse, shall designate a
Home State where the individual has a current license in good standing.
The individual may retain the Home State designation during the period
the service member is on active duty.
B. An Active Military Member and their spouse shall not be required
to pay to the Commission for a Compact Privilege any fee that may
-8-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
otherwise be charged by the Commission. If a Remote State chooses to
charge a fee for a Compact Privilege, it may choose to charge a reduced
fee or no fee to an Active Military Member and their spouse for a Compact
Privilege.
SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A Member State in which a Licensee is licensed shall have
authority to impose Adverse Action against the license issued by that
Member State.
B. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on Significant
Investigative Information of a Remote State or the Home State, so long as
the Member State follows its own procedures for imposing Adverse Action.
C. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's decision
that participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of
Adverse Action and that such participation shall remain non-public if
required by the Member State's laws.
D. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
1. Take Adverse Actions as set forth herein against a Licensee's
Compact Privilege in that State;
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the production of
evidence.
a. Subpoenas may be issued by a Respiratory Therapy Licensing
Authority in a Member State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses
and the production of evidence.
b. Subpoenas issued by a Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority in
a Member State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses shall be
enforced in the latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction in
the latter State, according to the practice and procedure of that court
applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it.
c. Subpoenas issued by a Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority in
a Member State for production of evidence from another Member State shall
-9-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
be enforced in the latter State, according to the practice and procedure
of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in the proceedings pending
before it.
d. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the
State where the witnesses or evidence are located;
3. Unless otherwise prohibited by State law, recover from the
Licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting
from any Adverse Action taken against that Licensee;
4. Notwithstanding subsection D.2., a Member State may not issue a
subpoena to gather evidence of conduct in another Member State that is
lawful in such other Member State for the purpose of taking Adverse
Action against a Licensee's Compact Privilege or application for a
Compact Privilege in that Member State; and
5. Nothing in this Compact authorizes a Member State to impose
discipline against a Respiratory Therapist's Compact Privilege in that
Member State for the individual's otherwise lawful practice in another
State.
E. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its
respective Respiratory Therapy Practice act or other applicable state
law, a Member State may participate with other Member States in joint
investigations of Licensees, provided, however, that a Member State
receiving such a request has no obligation to respond to any subpoena
issued regarding an investigation of conduct or practice that was lawful
in a Member State at the time it was undertaken.
2. Member States shall share any Significant Investigative
Information, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any
joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact. In sharing
such information between Member State Respiratory Therapy Licensing
Authorities, all information obtained shall be kept confidential, except
-10-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
as otherwise mutually agreed upon by the sharing and receiving Member
States.
F. Nothing in this Compact may permit a Member State to take any
Adverse Action against a Licensee or holder of a Compact Privilege for
conduct or practice that was legal in the Member State at the time it was
undertaken.
G. Nothing in this Compact may permit a Member State to take
disciplinary action against a Licensee or holder of a Compact Privilege
for conduct or practice that was legal in the Member State at the time it
was undertaken.
SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE RESPIRATORY CARE INTERSTATE COMPACT
COMMISSION
A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that
have enacted the Compact known as the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact
Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact Member
States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The
Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of
the Compact, as set forth in Section 11.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one Commissioner
selected by that Member State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority.
2. The Commissioner shall be an administrator or their designated
staff member of the Member State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing
Authority.
3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office
for Commissioners and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The Commission may recommend to a Member State the removal or
suspension of any Commissioner from office.
5. A Member State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority shall
fill any vacancy of its Commissioner occurring on the Commission within
-11-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
sixty days of the vacancy.
6. Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters
before the Commission requiring a vote by Commissioners.
7. A Commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for Commissioners to meet
by telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of communication.
8. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish and amend the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish and amend bylaws and policies, including, but not
limited to, a code of conduct and conflict of interest;
3. Establish and amend Rules, which shall be binding in all Member
States;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions
of this Compact, the Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conduct legal proceedings or actions in the name of
the Commission, provided that the standing of any Respiratory Therapy
Licensing Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be
affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member
State as the authenticated business records of the Commission, and
designate an agent to do so on the Commission's behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Accept or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a Member State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out
the purposes of the Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel
-12-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications
of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of
money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same, provided that at
all times:
a. The Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety; and
b. The Commission shall avoid any appearance of conflict of
interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money in a fiscally responsible manner;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of
Commissioners, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested
persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
20. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair,
vice-chair, secretary, treasurer, and such other offices as the
Commission shall establish by Rule or bylaw;
21. Enter into contracts or arrangements for the management of the
affairs of the Commission;
22. Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially
different from the Model Compact language such that the State would not
qualify for participation in the Compact; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate
-13-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of
the Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers,
duties, and responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
Compact, including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the
Compact, its Rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws,
changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member
States, fees charged to Licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately
provided, including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Member States and providing
compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during the
interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and
duties expressly reserved to the Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Performing other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to nine members,
as further set forth in the bylaws of the Commission:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the Commission from the
current membership of the Commission; and
b. Two ex-officio, non-voting members.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee
as provided in the Commission's bylaws.
-14-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except
that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as
provided in subsection F.4 below;
b. The Executive Committee shall give advance notice of its
meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide notice to
persons with an interest in the business of the Commission; and
c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance
with subsection F.2 below.
E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an
annual report.
F. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to
subsection 7.F.4 shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings
shall be posted on the Commission's website at least thirty days prior to
the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 7.F.1, the Commission may convene an
emergency public meeting by providing at least twenty-four hours prior
notice on the Commission's website, and any other means as provided in
the Commission's Rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with
notice of proposed rulemaking under subsection 9.G. The Commission's
legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an
emergency public meeting has been met.
3. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date,
and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or
accessible via telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic
means, the notice shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
4. The Commission or the Executive Committee may convene in a
closed, non-public meeting for the Commission or Executive Committee to
receive or solicit legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the
-15-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters,
practices or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee or Compact
Privilege holder by the Commission or by a Member State's Respiratory
Therapy Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of
goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or
on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues
pursuant to the Compact;
k. Legal advice;
l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or
Member State law; or
m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding
officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each
relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the
minutes.
6. The Commission shall keep minutes in accordance with Commission
Rules and bylaws. All documents considered in connection with an action
shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a
closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
-16-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources
as provided herein.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from
each Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom
it grants a Compact Privilege to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the Commission and its staff. The aggregate annual
assessment amount for Member States, if any, shall be allocated based
upon a formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds or a loan adequate to meet the same; nor shall the
Commission pledge the credit of any of the Member States, except by and
with the authority of the Member State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established
under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds
handled by the Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review
by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the
financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual
report of the Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct,
which shall be governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
2. The Member States, Commissioners, officers, executive directors,
-17-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
employees, and agents of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim
for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil
liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is
made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to protect any such person from
suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by
the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any
way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
3. The Commission shall defend any Commissioner, officer, executive
director, employee, and agent of the Commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the
Commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein
shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
4. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
Commissioner, member, officer, executive director, employee, and agent of
the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties,
or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
-18-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
responsibilities; provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or
omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Member State's state action immunity or state action
affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman
Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or
anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the Commission.
SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system
containing licensure, Adverse Action, and the presence of Significant
Investigative Information.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary,
a Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System as
required by the Rules of the Commission, including, but not limited to:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a Licensee, license applicant, or Compact
Privilege holder and information related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and
other information related to such participation not made confidential
under Member State law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such
denial;
6. The presence of current Significant Investigative Information;
and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this
-19-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of
the Commission.
C. No Member State shall submit any information which constitutes
criminal history record information, as defined by applicable federal
law, to the Data System established hereunder.
D. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant
to this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the
Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated
business records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any
associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or
administrative proceedings in a Member State.
E. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in
any Member State will only be available to other Member States.
F. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any
Adverse Action against a Licensee and to monitor the database to
determine whether Adverse Action has been taken against a Licensee.
Adverse Action information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State
will be available to any other Member State.
G. Member States contributing information to the Data System may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing State.
H. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State
contributing the information shall be removed from the Data System.
SECTION 9. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or
effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is
invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a
manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the
-20-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of
review.
B. For purposes of the Compact, the Rules of the Commission shall
have the force of law in each Member State.
C. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to
the criteria set forth in this section and the Rules adopted thereunder.
Rules shall become binding as of the date specified in each Rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a
Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the
same manner used to adopt the Compact within four years of the date of
adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and
effect in any Member State.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments,
data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at
least thirty days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will
hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide
a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the Commission's notices
of proposed rulemaking, and
3. In such other ways as the Commission may by Rule specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the
Commission will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
-21-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference,
or other electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for
access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested
person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all
written comments and documents received by the Commission in response to
the proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience
of the Commission at hearings required by this section.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all Commissioners, take
final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and the
full text of the Rule.
1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided
the changes are consistent with the original purpose of the proposed
Rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for
the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in Section 9.L, the
effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty days after
issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency Rule with twenty-four hours' notice, and
with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking
procedures provided in the Compact and in this section shall be
-22-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no
event later than ninety days after the effective date of the Rule. For
the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be
adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or Rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the
website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by
any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The revision may be
challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change
to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
N. No Member State's rulemaking process or procedural requirements
shall apply to the Commission.
1. The Commission shall have no authority over any Member State's
rulemaking process or procedural requirements that do not pertain to the
Compact.
O. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule or regulation of the
Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce
the ability of a Member State to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or
other Rules related to the Practice of Respiratory Therapy in that State,
where those laws, regulations, or other Rules are not inconsistent with
-23-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
the provisions of this Compact.
SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in each
Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary
and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of
competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is
located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to
the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute
resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the
selection or propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for
professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact
and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of process shall
render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or
promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact
or the promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to
the defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the default,
the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
Commission may take, and shall offer training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to
the other Member States.
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
-24-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the Commissioners of the Member States, and all rights,
privileges and benefits conferred on that State by this Compact may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default
does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities
incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice
of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
Governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting State's
legislature, the defaulting State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing
Authority and each of the Member States' Respiratory Therapy Licensing
Authorities.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective
date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the
effective date of termination, if necessary.
F. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this Compact,
that State shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees and Compact
Privilege holders (of which the Commission has a record) within that
State of such termination. The terminated State shall continue to
recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of
one hundred eighty days after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that
is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact,
unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting
State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices.
The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
-25-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
including reasonable attorney's fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States
and between Member and non-Member States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. By majority vote, as may be further provided by Rule, the
Commission may initiate legal action against a Member State in default in
the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated
Rules. A Member State by enactment of this Compact consents to venue and
jurisdiction in such court for the purposes set forth herein. The relief
sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded
all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The
remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission.
The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or
the defaulting Member State's law.
2. A Member State may initiate legal action against the Commission
in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated
Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.
In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney's fees.
3. No person other than a Member State shall enforce this Compact
against the Commission.
-26-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State
("Effective Date").
1. On or after the Effective Date of the Compact, the Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven Member
States ("Charter Member States") to determine if the statute enacted by
each such Charter Member State is materially different than the Model
Compact.
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the default process
set forth in Section 10.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is
terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in
existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
Member States should be less than seven.
2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven
initial Charter Member States shall be subject to the process set forth
herein and Commission Rule to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for
participation in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to
the effective date of the Compact or the Commission coming into existence
shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless specifically
repudiated by the Commission. The Commission shall own and have all
rights to any intellectual property developed on behalf or in furtherance
of the Commission by individuals or entities involved in organizing or
establishing the Commission, as may be further set forth in Rules of the
Commission.
4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission's
-27-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Rules
and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law in
that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the Commission
shall have the full force and effect of law on the date the Compact
becomes law in that State.
B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until one
hundred eighty days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority to comply
with the investigative and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this
Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a
State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
Licensees and Compact Privilege holders (of which the Commission has a
record) within that State. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to
recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of
one hundred eighty days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a Member State and a non-Member State that does not
conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State
until it is enacted into the laws of all Member States.
SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the
-28-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules
shall not be construed to limit the Commission's rulemaking authority
solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any
phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a court
of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any
Member State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of the
United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency,
person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and
the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the Commission may
deny a State's participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of Section 10, terminate a Member State's participation in
the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a
Member State is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this
Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member
State, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the
remaining Member States and in full force and effect as to the Member
State affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
Member State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of
the conflict, including any subsequently enacted State laws.
C. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the Member
States are binding in accordance with their terms.
D. Other than as expressly set forth herein, nothing in this Compact
will impact initial licensure.
-29-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Section 38-131, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
38-131 (1) An applicant for an initial license to practice as a
registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a physical therapist, a
physical therapy assistant, a psychologist, a respiratory care
practitioner, an advanced emergency medical technician, an emergency
medical technician, an audiologist, a speech-language pathologist, a
licensed independent mental health practitioner, an occupational
therapist, an occupational therapy assistant, a dietitian, a certified
social worker, a certified master social worker, a licensed clinical
social worker, a paramedic, a physician, an osteopathic physician, a
physician or osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a temporary
educational permit, a physician or osteopathic physician who is an
applicant for a temporary visiting faculty permit, a physician assistant,
a dentist, a dental hygienist, an optometrist, a podiatrist, a
veterinarian, an advanced practice registered nurse-nurse practitioner,
an advanced practice registered nurse-certified nurse midwife, or an
advanced practice registered nurse-certified registered nurse anesthetist
shall be subject to a criminal background check. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, such an applicant for an initial license
shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the Nebraska State Patrol for
a criminal history record information check. The applicant shall
authorize release of the results of the national criminal history record
information check by the Federal Bureau of Investigation to the
department. The applicant shall pay the actual cost of the fingerprinting
and criminal background check.
(2) The Nebraska State Patrol is authorized to submit the
fingerprints of such applicants to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
and to issue a report to the department that includes the criminal
history record information concerning the applicant. The Nebraska State
Patrol shall forward submitted fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of
-30-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
Investigation for a national criminal history record information check.
The Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a report to the department that
includes the criminal history record information concerning the
applicant.
(3) This section shall not apply to a dentist who is an applicant
for a dental locum tenens under section 38-1122, to a physician or
osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a physician locum tenens
under section 38-2036, or to a veterinarian who is an applicant for a
veterinarian locum tenens under section 38-3335.
(4) A physician or osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a
temporary educational permit shall have ninety days from the issuance of
the permit to comply with subsection (1) of this section and shall have
such permit suspended after such ninety-day period if the criminal
background check is not complete or revoked if the criminal background
check reveals that the applicant was not qualified for the permit.
(5) The department and the Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations concerning costs associated with the
fingerprinting and the national criminal history record information
check.
(6) For purposes of interpretation by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, the term department in this section means the Division of
Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 3. Section 38-3208, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-3208 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
person shall not engage in the practice of respiratory care unless such
person is licensed pursuant to the Respiratory Care Practice Act or holds
a compact privilege under the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section The Respiratory Care Practice Act
shall not prohibit:
(a) (1) The practice of respiratory care which is an integral part
-31-

LB735 LB735
2026 2026
of the program of study by students enrolled in approved respiratory care
education programs;
(b) (2) The gratuitous care, including the practice of respiratory
care, of the ill by a friend or member of the family or by a person who
is not licensed to practice respiratory care if such person does not
represent himself or herself as a respiratory care practitioner;
(c) (3) The practice of respiratory care by nurses, physicians,
physician assistants, physical therapists, or any other professional
required to be licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act when such
practice is within the scope of practice for which that person is
licensed to practice in this state;
(d) (4) The practice of any respiratory care practitioner of this
state or any other state or territory while employed by the federal
government or any bureau or division thereof while in the discharge of
his or her official duties;
(e) (5) Techniques defined as pulmonary function testing and the
administration of aerosol and inhalant medications to the
cardiorespiratory system as it relates to pulmonary function technology
administered by a registered pulmonary function technologist credentialed
by the National Board for Respiratory Care or a certified pulmonary
function technologist credentialed by the National Board for Respiratory
Care; or
(f) (6) The performance of oxygen therapy or the initiation of
noninvasive positive pressure ventilation by a registered
polysomnographic technologist relating to the study of sleep disorders if
such procedures are performed or initiated under the supervision of a
licensed physician at a facility accredited by the American Academy of
Sleep Medicine.
Sec. 4. Original section 38-3208, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 38-131, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-32-